Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB547.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.1(c.1)(3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1205.1. Continuing Professional Development.--* * *(c.1) The continuing professional education plan shall specify the professional education needs that will be met by completion of each continuing professional education option and how it relates to areas of assignment and certification or potential administrative certification. The options may include, but shall not be limited to:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (3) Other programs, activities or learning experiences taken for credit or hourly, to include:(i) curriculum development and other program design and delivery activities at the school entity or grade level as determined by the school entity and approved by the board of directors;(ii) participation in professional conferences and workshops;(iii) education in the workplace, where the work relates to the professional educator's area of assignment and is approved by the board of directors;(iv) review, redesign and restructuring of school programs, organizations and functions as determined by the school entity and approved by the board of directors;(v) in-service programs that comply with guidelines established by the department;(vi) early childhood and child development activities for professional educators whose area of assignment includes kindergarten through third grade;(vii) special education activities for professional educators whose area of assignment includes students with special needs;(viii) successful completion of department training for service as a Distinguished Educator if the professional educator participates in and completes at least one assignment in the Distinguished Educators Program;(ix) other continuing professional education courses, programs, activities or learning experiences sponsored by the department; [or](x) visits by educators to a manufacturing workplace for 20250SB0547PN0562 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 orientation and demonstrations to give the professional educator a greater understanding of job opportunities in manufacturing for students[.]; or(xi) providing opportunities for educators to serve as advanced coursework coaches to support teachers in delivering high-quality advanced coursework instruction.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-EACCESS TO ADVANCED COURSES FOR ALL STUDENTSSection 1701-E. Scope of article.This article relates to access to advanced courses for all students.Section 1702-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced course." An academically rigorous college-level course delivered to secondary students by an eligible educator that includes an end-of-course exam that qualifies students to earn college credit for prior learning."Core academic areas." Mathematics, English language arts, science, social studies and computer science."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Educator." A "professional employe," "temporary professional employe" or "substitute" as those terms are defined in section 1101."Educator training entity." An institution of higher education, intermediate unit or other organization approved by 20250SB0547PN0562 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department to train educators to teach advanced courses. For courses, the educator training entity shall also be endorsed by the provider of advanced course work."Eligible educator." An educator who is certified in the subject area of the advanced course that the educator will be teaching."Eligible school entity." A school entity that does not meet the minimum benchmarks for advanced course offerings established by the department under section 1703-E(b)(2)(i) or is unable to offer an advanced course due to the retirement, departure or other loss of an educator who teaches an advanced course."Exam fee." The amount required to take an exam associated with an advanced course."Institution of higher education." The term includes any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(3) A State-related institution as defined in section 1502-A.(4) Any accredited nonprofit public, private or independent college or university."Program." The Access to Advanced Courses for All Students Grant Program established under section 1704-E."School entity." A school district, area career and technical school, charter school or regional charter school operating in this Commonwealth."Secondary student." A student in grades seven through twelve who is enrolled in a school entity."Virtual learning instruction." The provision of academic 20250SB0547PN0562 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 courses and instruction to students through the Internet or the use of video or audio technology.Section 1703-E. Equitable access to advanced courses.(a) Access.-- Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each school entity receiving a grant under section 1704-E(b) shall provide secondary students with expanded opportunities to enroll in advanced courses as well as exam fee assistance, as appropriate.(b) Duties.-- (1) No later than September 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, each school entity shall report to the department, in a manner determined by the department, all advanced course offerings that are available to the school entity's secondary students for the current school year as well as the number of students participating in advanced courses, completing advanced courses and taking an end-of-course exam.(2) No later than December 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, the department shall:(i) Establish benchmarks to improve secondary student access to and enrollment in advanced courses.(ii) Identify school entities that require intensive assistance to improve secondary student access to and enrollment in advanced courses.(iii) Prepare a report containing the information provided under paragraph (1), as well as the benchmarks established and school districts identified under subparagraphs (i) and (ii), and post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Beginning with the report required to be posted on 20250SB0547PN0562 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 December 1, 2031, the report shall include an explanation of whether school entities in this Commonwealth are progressing or regressing in improving secondary student access to and enrollment in advanced courses.Section 1704-E. Access to Advanced Courses for All Students Grant Program.(a) Purpose.--The Access to Advanced Courses for All Students Grant Program is established in the department to help ensure that all school entities have properly trained educators to meet the advanced course benchmarks established under section 1703-E(b)(2)(i), to provide advanced course exam fee assistance to students and to make money available for nationally normed assessments.(b) Educator training grants to school entities.--(1) A school entity that does not meet a minimum advanced course benchmark established by the department under section 1703-E(b)(2)(i) shall be eligible for annual grants for a maximum of five consecutive years to train educators to teach advanced courses to enable the school entity to meet the benchmark and further expand access to advanced courses beyond the benchmark over the five-year grant period.(2) The department may limit the number of educators per school building within an eligible school entity for whom the eligible school entity may receive an educator training grant.(3) Multiple eligible school entities may apply jointly for an educator training grant under the program if the educators to be trained will provide instruction in more than one eligible school entity through classroom instruction or virtual learning instruction.20250SB0547PN0562 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The department shall develop an application process and application form for an eligible school entity seeking an educator training grant under the program. The application form shall include the following:(i) The subject areas in which the eligible school entity currently has advanced course offerings.(ii) The subject areas in which the eligible school entity does not have advanced course offerings.(iii) The eligible school entity's plan to expand and increase advanced course participation within the eligible school entity, including for student populations that have been traditionally underserved, and how an educator training grant will help expedite the eligible school entity's progress toward its advanced course participation goals.(iv) The following information:(A) The names of the eligible educators to be trained using educator training grant proceeds.(B) The school buildings within the eligible school entity where the eligible educators will teach.(C) The advanced course subject areas in which the eligible educators will provide instruction.(D) Whether the instruction will be provided through traditional classroom instruction or virtual learning instruction.(v) The names of the educator training entities that will train the eligible educators to teach advanced courses.(vi) An agreement that the eligible school entity 20250SB0547PN0562 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 will commit to offering the advanced courses to secondary students for at least five years.(5) By June 30 of each year, each school entity that receives an educator training grant under this section shall report to the department the following for the immediately preceding school year in a form and manner determined by the department:(i) The number of students who enrolled in an advanced course taught by an educator who received training funded by the grant and the number of students who completed the course.(ii) The number of students who took an end-of-course exam in an advanced course taught by an educator who received training funded by the grant.(iii) The grade levels in which advanced courses were taught.(iv) The number of educators who received training funded by the grant who taught advanced courses within the school entity.(c) Exam fee grant to students.--Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, the department shall provide advanced course exam fee assistance in accordance with the following:(1) The department shall reimburse school entities 100% of the exam fee for each student at or above 185% of the Federal poverty level who completes an advanced course for which the student is required or chooses to take an exam.(2) On an annual basis, each school entity shall certify to the department the amount of reimbursement due under paragraph (1) in accordance with guidelines developed by the department and posted on the department's publicly accessible 20250SB0547PN0562 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet website.(d) Nationally normed assessments.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall make money available to school entities to administer nationally normed assessments to students in grade 10 that can be used to identify students ready for advanced coursework, provide access to college scholarships and provide information about college and career opportunities.Section 1705-E. Powers and duties of department.(a) Rules.--The department shall promulgate rules and procedures necessary for the implementation of this article.(b) Report.--By September 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter, the department shall issue a report on the program to the General Assembly that includes:(1) The number of educators in school entities who received training in advanced course instruction delineated by type of advanced course instruction.(2) The number and percentage of schools enrolling secondary students that offer advanced courses and the change in advanced course offerings over the five-year grant period.(3) The number and percentage of secondary students who completed advanced courses at school entities.(4) The number and percentage of secondary students who achieved a qualifying score, reported separately from an advanced course exam at school entities.(5) The number and percentage of institutions of higher education located within this Commonwealth that provide academic course credit for advanced course exam scores. (6) The names of the school entities and high schools that do not offer advanced courses or are below the minimum benchmark established by the department under section 1703-20250SB0547PN0562 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 E(b)(2)(i).(7) The number of educators who where trained to teach advanced courses outside the core academic areas who are teaching other advanced courses.Section 1706-E. Program funding.(a) Funding.--Funding for the program shall be made from annual appropriations made by the General Assembly to the department for that purpose, as well as available Federal funds or funds from private sources.(b) Priorities.--In the event of insufficient funds in any fiscal year, the department shall prioritize funding of eligible school entities based on the eligible school entity's poverty level and deficiency in providing advanced course opportunities as compared to the benchmark established by the department under section 1703-E(b)(2)(i).Section 1707-E. Rights of school employees.Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law, including the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with that act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0547PN0562 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425